Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 74. Energy Efficiency Standards for Appliances and Equipment

§ 2791.
General purpose.

This chapter establishes minimum efficiency standards for certain products sold or installed in the State.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2792.
Findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

Efficiency standards for certain products sold or installed in the State assure consumers and businesses that those products meet minimum efficiency performance levels, thus saving money on utility bills.

These efficiency standards save energy and thus reduce pollution and other environmental impacts associated with the production, distribution, and use of electricity, natural gas, and oil.

These efficiency standards can make electricity systems more reliable by reducing the strain on the electricity grid during peak demand periods. Furthermore, improved energy efficiency can reduce or delay the need for new power plants, power transmission lines, and power distribution system upgrades.

Energy efficiency standards contribute to the economy of this State by helping to balance better energy supply and demand, thus reducing pressure for higher natural gas and electricity prices. By saving consumers and businesses money on energy bills, efficiency standards help the State and local economy since energy bill savings can be spent on local goods and services.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2793.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Ballast” means a device used with an electric discharge lamp to obtain necessary circuit conditions (voltage, current, and waveform) for starting and operating the lamp.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Public Service.

“Compensation” means money or any other valuable thing, regardless of form, received or to be received by a person for services rendered.

“Electricity ratio (ER)” is the ratio of furnace electricity use to total furnace energy use. ER = (3.412*E/iE)/(1000*E + 3.412 E/iE) where E (average annual auxiliary electrical consumption) and E (average annual fuel energy consumption) are defined in , Subpart B, Appendix N. A F A A E F 10 C.F.R. Part 430

Click to view

“High-intensity discharge lamp” means a lamp in which light is produced by the passage of an electric current through a vapor or gas and in which the light-producing arc is stabilized by bulb wall temperature, and the arc tube has a bulb wall loading in excess of three watts per square centimeter.

“Medium voltage dry-type distribution transformer” means a transformer that:

has an input voltage of more than 600 volts but less than or equal to 34,500 volts;

is air-cooled;

does not use oil as a coolant; and

is rated for operation at a frequency of 60 hertz.

“Metal halide lamp” means a high intensity discharge lamp in which the major portion of the light is produced by radiation of metal halides and their products of dissociation, possibly in combination with metallic vapors.

“Metal halide lamp fixture” means a light fixture designed to be operated with a metal halide lamp and a ballast for a metal halide lamp.

“Probe-start metal halide ballast” means a ballast used to operate metal halide lamps that does not contain an ignitor and that instead starts lamps by using a third starting electrode probe in the arc tube.

“Residential boiler” means a self-contained appliance that is primarily designed for space heating by means of steam or hot water and that uses only single-phase electric current in conjunction with natural gas, propane, or home heating oil and that has a heat input rate of less than 300,000 Btus per hour.

“Residential furnace” means a self-contained space heater designed to supply heated air through ducts of more than 10 inches in length and that utilizes only single-phase electric current or single-phase electric current or DC current in conjunction with natural gas, propane, or home heating oil, and that:

is designed to be the principal heating source for the living space of one or more residences;

is not contained within the same cabinet with a central air conditioner whose rated cooling capacity is above 65,000 Btus per hour; and

has a heat input rate of less than 225,000 Btus per hour.

“Single-voltage external AC to DC power supply” means a device that:

is designed to convert line voltage AC input into lower voltage DC output;

is able to convert to only one DC output voltage at a time;

is sold with, or intended to be used with, a separate end-use product that constitutes the primary power load;

is contained within a separate physical enclosure from the end-use product;

is connected to the end-use product via a removable or hard-wired male or female electrical connection, cable, cord, or other wiring;

does not have batteries or battery packs, including those that are removable, that physically attach directly to the power supply unit;

does not have a battery chemistry or type selector switch and indicator light; or does not have a battery chemistry or type selector switch and a state of charge meter; and

has a nameplate output power less than or equal to 250 watts.

“State-regulated incandescent reflector lamp” means a lamp that is not colored or designed for rough or vibration service applications, that has an inner reflective coating on the outer bulb to direct the light, an E26 medium screw base, and a rated voltage or voltage range that lies at least partially within 115 and 130 volts, and that falls into either of the following categories:

a blown PAR (BPAR), bulged reflector (BR), or elliptical reflector (ER) bulb shape, with a diameter that equals or exceeds 2.25 inches; or

a reflector (R), parabolic aluminized reflector (PAR), or similar bulb shape with a diameter of 2.25 to 2.75 inches.

“Transformer” means a device that consists of two or more coils of insulated wire and that is designed to transfer alternating current by electromagnetic induction from one coil to another, in order to change the original voltage or current value.
(14) (A) “Transformer” means a device that consists of two or more coils of insulated wire and that is designed to transfer alternating current by electromagnetic induction from one coil to another, in order to change the original voltage or current value.

The term “transformer” does not include:

devices with multiple voltage taps, with the highest voltage tap equaling at least 20 percent more than the lowest voltage tap; or

devices, such as those commonly known as drive transformers, rectifier transformers, auto transformers, uninterruptible power system transformers, impedance transformers, regulating transformers, sealed and nonventilating transformers, machine tool transformers, welding transformers, grounding transformers, or testing transformers, that are designed to be used in a special purpose application and are unlikely to be used in general purpose applications.

“General service lamp” has the same meaning as set forth in the action published at 82 Fed. Reg. 7276, 7321-22 (January 19, 2017) and modified by the action published at 82 Fed. Reg. 7322, 7333 (January 19, 2017).

With respect to air compressors, the following definitions apply:

“Air compressor” means a compressor that is designed to compress air that has an inlet open to the atmosphere or other source of air and that consists of the bare compressor, also known as the compression element; one or more drivers; mechanical equipment to drive the compression element; and any ancillary equipment.

“Compressor” means a machine or apparatus that converts different types of energy into the potential energy of gas pressure for displacement and compression of gaseous media to any higher-pressure values above atmospheric pressure and has a pressure ratio at full-load operating pressure greater than 1.3.

“Commercial dishwasher” means a machine designed to clean and sanitize plates, pots, pans, glasses, cups, bowls, utensils, and trays by applying sprays of detergent solution, with or without blasting media granules, and a sanitizing rinse. The phrase “commercial dishwasher” does not include dishwashers intended for consumer use as defined in 10 C.F.R. § 430.2.

“Commercial fryer” means an appliance, including a cooking vessel, in which oil is placed to such a depth that the cooking food is supported by displacement of the cooking fluid rather than by the bottom of the vessel. Heat is delivered to the cooking fluid by means of an immersed electric element of band-wrapped vessel or by heat transfer from gas burners either through the walls of the fryer or through tubes passing through the cooking fluid.

“Commercial hot-food holding cabinet” means a heated, fully enclosed compartment with one or more solid or transparent doors designed to maintain the temperature of hot food that has been cooked using a separate appliance. The phrase “commercial hot-food holding cabinet” does not include heated glass merchandizing cabinets, drawer warmers, or cook-and-hold appliances.

“Commercial steam cooker” means a device with one or more food-steaming compartments in which the energy in the steam is transferred to the food by direct contact. A commercial steam cooker may also be known as a compartment steamer.

“ENERGY STAR Program” means the federal program initiated by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to

42 U.S.C. § 7403(g)

that includes certification of energy-saving products, buildings, and tools, and includes other resources for saving energy.

With respect to faucets and showerheads, the following definitions apply:

“Faucet” means a lavatory faucet, kitchen faucet, metering faucet, public lavatory faucet, or replacement aerator for a lavatory, public lavatory, or kitchen faucet. As used in this subdivision (22)(A):

“Metering faucet” means a fitting that, when turned on, will gradually shut itself off over a period of several seconds.

“Public lavatory faucet” means a fitting intended to be installed in nonresidential bathrooms that are exposed to walk-in traffic.

“Replacement aerator” means an aerator sold as a replacement, separate from the faucet to which it is intended to be attached.

“Showerhead” means an accessory to a supply fitting for spraying water onto a bather, typically from an overhead position. The term includes a body spray and handheld shower. As used in this subdivision (22)(B):

“Body spray” means a shower device for spraying water onto a bather other than from the overhead position.

“Handheld shower” means a showerhead that can be held or fixed in place for the purpose of spraying water onto a bather and that is connected to a flexible hose.

“High color rendering index (CRI) fluorescent lamp” means a fluorescent lamp with a color rendering index of 87 or greater that is not a compact fluorescent lamp.

“Luminaire” means a complete lighting unit consisting of a fluorescent lamp or lamps, together with parts designed to distribute the light, to position and protect such lamps, and to connect such lamps to the power supply through the ballast.

With respect to portable air conditioners, the following definitions apply:

“Portable air conditioner” means a portable encased assembly, other than a packaged terminal air conditioner, room air conditioner, or dehumidifier, that includes a source of refrigeration; delivers cooled, conditioned air to an enclosed space; and is powered by single-phase electric current. The assembly may include additional means for air circulation and heating and may be a single-duct or a dual-duct portable air conditioner.

“Single-duct portable air conditioner” means a portable air conditioner that draws all of the condenser inlet air from the conditioned space without the means of a duct and discharges the condenser outlet air outside the conditioned space through a single duct attached to an adjustable window bracket.

“Dual-duct portable air conditioner” means a portable air conditioner that draws some or all of the condenser inlet air from outside the conditioned space through a duct attached to an adjustable window bracket, may draw additional condenser inlet air from the conditioned space, and discharges the condenser outlet air outside the conditioned space by means of a separate duct attached to an adjustable window bracket.

“Portable electric spa” means a factory-built electric spa or hot tub, which may or may not include any combination of integral controls, water heating, or water circulating equipment.

“Residential ventilating fan” means a ceiling, wall-mounted, or remotely mounted in-line fan designed to be used in a bathroom or utility room whose purpose is to move air from inside the building to the outdoors.

With respect to spray sprinkler bodies, the following definitions apply:

“Pressure regulator” means a device that maintains constant operating pressure immediately downstream from the device, given higher pressure upstream.

“Spray sprinkler body” means the exterior case or shell of a sprinkler incorporating a means of connection to the piping system designed to convey water to a nozzle or orifice.

“T12 fluorescent lamp” means a tubular fluorescent lamp to which one of the following applies:

The lamp has a nominal rating of 34 watts, is 48 inches in length and one and one-half inches in diameter, and conforms to ANSI standard C78.81-2003 (Data Sheet 7881-ANSI-1006-1). Such a lamp is often referred to as an “F34T12 lamp” or an “F40T12/ES lamp.”

The lamp has a nominal rating of 40 watts, is 48 inches in length and one and one-half inches in diameter, and conforms to ANSI standard C78.81-2003 (Data Sheet 7881-ANSI-1010-1). Such a lamp is often referred to as an “F40T12 lamp.”

The lamp has a nominal rating of 60 watts, is 96 inches in length and one and one-half inches in diameter, and conforms to ANSI standard C78.81-2003 (Data Sheet 7881-ANSI-3006-1). Such a lamp is often referred to as an “F96T12/ES lamp.”

The lamp has a nominal rating of 75 watts, is 96 inches in length and one and one-half inches in diameter, and conforms to ANSI standard C78.81-2003 (Data Sheet 7881-ANSI-3007-1). Such a lamp is often referred to as an “F96T12 lamp.”

The lamp has a nominal rating of 95 watts, is 96 inches in length and one and one-half inches in diameter, and conforms to ANSI standard C78.81-2003 (Data Sheet 7881-ANSI-1017-1). Such a lamp is often referred to as an “F96T12HO/ES lamp.”

The lamp has a nominal rating of 110 watts, is 96 inches in length and one and one-half inches in diameter, and conforms to ANSI standard C78.81-2003 (Data Sheet 7881-ANSI-1019-1). Such a lamp is often referred to as an “F96T12HO lamp.”

“Uninterruptible power supply” means a battery charger consisting of a combination of convertors, switches, and energy storage devices, such as batteries, constituting a power system that maintains continuity of load power in case of input power failure.

With respect to urinals, the following definitions apply:

“Plumbing fixture” means an exchangeable device that connects to a plumbing system to deliver and drain away water and waste.

“Trough-type urinal” means a urinal designed for simultaneous use by two or more persons.

“Urinal” means a plumbing fixture that receives only liquid body waste and conveys the waste through a trap into a drainage system.

With respect to water coolers, the following definitions apply:

“Cold-only unit” means a water cooler that dispenses cold water only.

“Cook and cold unit” means a water cooler that dispenses both cold and room-temperature water.

“Hot and cold unit” means a water cooler that dispenses both hot and cold water. A hot and cold unit also may dispense room-temperature water.

“On demand” means that a water cooler heats water as it is requested, which typically takes a few minutes to deliver.

“Storage-type” means that a water cooler stores thermally conditioned water in a tank and the conditioned water is available instantaneously. Storage-type water coolers include point-of-use, dry storage compartment, and bottled water coolers.

“Water cooler” means a freestanding device that consumes energy to cool or heat potable water, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 22, 2017;

2017, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2794.
Scope.

The provisions of this chapter apply to the following types of new products sold, offered for sale, or installed in the State:

Medium voltage dry-type distribution transformers.

Metal halide lamp fixtures.

Residential furnaces and residential boilers.

Single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies.

State-regulated incandescent reflector lamps.

General service lamps.

Air compressors.

Commercial dishwashers.

Commercial fryers.

Commercial hot-food holding cabinets.

Commercial steam cookers.

Computers and computer monitors.

Faucets.

High CRI fluorescent lamps.

Portable air conditioners.

Portable electric spas.

Residential ventilating fans.

Showerheads.

Spray sprinkler bodies.

Uninterruptible power supplies.

Urinals.

Water coolers.

Each other product for which the Commissioner is required to adopt an efficiency or water conservation standard by rule pursuant to section 2795 of this title.

Any other product that may be designated by the Commissioner in accordance with section 2797 of this title.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

New products manufactured in the State and sold outside the State and the equipment used in manufacturing those products.

New products manufactured outside the State and sold at wholesale inside the State for final retail sale and installation outside the State.

Products installed in mobile manufactured homes at the time of construction.

Products designed expressly for installation and use in recreational vehicles.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 42

, § 3, eff. May 22, 2017;

2017, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 2795.
Efficiency and water conservation standards.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules in accordance with the provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 establishing minimum efficiency standards for the types of new products set forth in section 2794 of this title. The rules shall provide for the following minimum efficiency standards for products sold or installed in this State:

Medium voltage dry-type distribution transformers shall at a minimum meet the efficiency requirements set forth for such transformers in 10 C.F.R. § 431.196, as those requirements may be amended from time to time.

Metal halide lamp fixtures designed to be operated with lamps rated greater than or equal to 150 watts but less than or equal to 500 watts shall not contain a probe-start metal halide ballast.

Residential furnaces and residential boilers shall meet or exceed the following Annual Fuel Utilization Efficiency (AFUE) and electricity ratio values:
(3) (A) Residential furnaces and residential boilers shall meet or exceed the following Annual Fuel Utilization Efficiency (AFUE) and electricity ratio values:

AFUE shall be measured in accordance with the federal test method for measuring the energy consumption of furnaces and boilers contained in Appendix N to subpart B of part 430, Title 10, Code of Federal Regulations.

The Commissioner may adopt rules to exempt compliance with these residential furnace or residential boiler AFUE standards at any building, site, or location where complying with these standards would be in conflict with any local zoning ordinance, building or plumbing code, or other rule regarding installation and venting of residential boilers or residential furnaces.

Click to view

Single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies shall meet the energy efficiency requirements of the following table:
(4) (A) Single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies shall meet the energy efficiency requirements of the following table:

This standard applies to single voltage AC to DC power supplies that are sold individually and to those that are sold as a component of or in conjunction with another product. Single voltage AC to DC power supplies that are made available by a product manufacturer as accessories, service parts, or spare parts for its products manufactured prior to January 1, 2008 shall be exempt from the requirements of this standard.

For purposes of this subdivision (4), the efficiency of single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies shall be measured in accordance with the test methodology specified by the ENERGY STAR Program, “Test Method for Calculating the Energy Efficiency of Single-Voltage External AC-DC and AC-AC Power Supplies (August 11, 2004).”

Click to view

* Where Ln (Nameplate Output) = Natural logarithm of the nameplate output expressed in watts.

State-regulated incandescent reflector lamps shall meet the minimum average lamp efficacy requirements for federally regulated incandescent reflector lamps contained in

42 U.S.C. § 6295(i)

(1)(A).
(5) (A) State-regulated incandescent reflector lamps shall meet the minimum average lamp efficacy requirements for federally regulated incandescent reflector lamps contained in

42 U.S.C. § 6295(i)

(1)(A).

The following types of incandescent reflector lamps are exempt from these requirements:

lamps rated at 50 watts or less of the following types: BR30, ER30, BR40, and ER40;

lamps rated at 65 watts of the following types: BR30, BR40, and ER40; and

R20 lamps of 45 watts or less.

In the rules, the Commissioner shall adopt minimum efficiency and water conservation standards for each product that is subject to a standard under 10 C.F.R. §§ 430 and 431 as those provisions existed on January 19, 2017. The minimum standard and the testing protocol for each product shall be the same as adopted in those sections of the Code of Federal Regulations, except that for faucets, showerheads, and urinals, the minimum standard and testing protocol shall be as otherwise set forth in this section.

In the rules, the Commissioner shall adopt a minimum efficacy standard for general service lamps of 45 lumens per watt, when tested in accordance with 10 C.F.R. § 430.23(gg) as that provision existed on January 19, 2017.

In this subdivision (8), “final rule” means the document setting forth a final action by the U.S. Department of Energy (DOE) with respect to a final rule for “Energy Conservation Standards for Air Compressors,” docket no. EERE-2013-BT-STD-0040, approved by DOE on December 5, 2016. Air compressors that meet the 12 criteria to be codified under 10 C.F.R. § 431.345(a) and set forth on pages 350 to 351 of the final rule shall meet the requirements contained in Table 1 on page 352 of the final rule using the instructions to be codified under 10 C.F.R. § 431.345(b) and set forth on page 353 of the final rule. Compliance with these requirements shall be measured in accordance with 10 C.F.R. Part 431, Subpart T, Appendix A, entitled “Uniform Test Method for Certain Air Compressors,” as in effect on July 3, 2017.

Commercial dishwashers included in the scope of the “ENERGY STAR Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Dishwashers,” Version 2.0, shall meet the qualification criteria of that specification.

Commercial fryers included in the scope of the “ENERGY STAR Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Fryers,” Version 2.0, shall meet the qualification criteria of that specification.

Commercial hot-food holding cabinets shall have a maximum idle energy rate of 40 watts per cubic foot of interior volume, as determined by the “idle energy rate-dry test” in ASTM F2140-11, “Standard Test Method for Performance of Hot-Food Holding Cabinets,” ASTM International (2011). Interior volume shall be measured as prescribed in the “ENERGY STAR Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Hot-Food Holding Cabinets,” Version 2.0.

Commercial steam cookers shall meet the requirements of the “ENERGY STAR Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Steam Cookers,” Version 1.2.

Computers and computer monitors shall meet the requirements of 20 California Code of Regulations (C.C.R.) § 1605.3(v) and compliance with these requirements shall be measured in accordance with test methods prescribed in 20 C.C.R. § 1604(v).

For the purposes of this subdivision (13), terms used in the referenced portions of the C.C.R. shall be as defined in 20 C.C.R. § 1602.

The rules shall define “computer” and “computer monitor” to have the same meaning as set forth in 20 C.C.R. § 1602(v).

The referenced portions of the C.C.R. shall be those adopted on or before July 1, 2018. However, the Commissioner shall have authority to amend the rules so that the definitions of “computer” and “computer monitor” and the minimum efficiency standards for computers and computer monitors conform to subsequently adopted modifications to the referenced sections of the C.C.R.

Faucets, except for metering faucets, and showerheads shall meet the standards set forth in this subdivision (14) when tested in accordance with 10 C.F.R. Part 430, Subpart B, Appendix S, entitled “Uniform Test Method for Measuring the Water Consumption of Faucets and Showerheads,” as in effect on January 3, 2017.

Lavatory faucets and replacement aerators shall not exceed a maximum flow rate of 1.5 gallons per minute (gpm) at 60 pounds per square inch (psi).

Residential kitchen faucets and replacement aerators shall not exceed a maximum flow rate of 1.8 gpm at 60 psi, with optional temporary flow of 2.2 gpm, provided they default to a maximum flow rate of 1.8 gpm at 60 psi after each use.

Public lavatory faucets and replacement aerators shall not exceed a maximum flow rate of 0.5 gpm at 60 psi.

Showerheads shall not exceed a maximum flow rate of 2.0 gpm at 80 psi.

High CRI fluorescent lamps shall meet the minimum efficacy requirements contained in 10 C.F.R. § 430.32(n)(4) as that subdivision existed on January 3, 2017. Compliance with requirements shall be measured in accordance with 10 C.F.R. Part 430, Subpart B, Appendix R, entitled “Uniform Test Method for Measuring Average Lamp Efficacy (LE), Color Rendering Index (CRI), and Correlated Color Temperature (CCT) of Electric Lamps,” as that appendix existed on January 3, 2017.

Urinals, other than trough-type urinals and urinals designed and marketed exclusively for use at prisons or mental health facilities, shall have a maximum flush volume of 0.5 gallons per flush when tested in accordance with 10 C.F.R. Part 430, Subpart B, Appendix T, entitled “Uniform Test Method for Measuring the Water Consumption of Water Closets and Urinals,” as in effect on January 3, 2017 and shall pass the waste extraction test for water closets set forth in Sec. 7.10 of the American Society of Mechanical Engineers (ASME) standard A112.19.2-2013/CSA B.45.1, as that standard exists on July 1, 2018.

Portable air conditioners shall have a Combined Energy Efficiency Ratio (CEER), that is greater than or equal to: 1.04 x [SACC/(3.7177 x SACC0.638/f4)].

In this subdivision (17), “SACC” means seasonally adjusted cooling capacity expressed in British thermal units per hour.

The CEER shall be measured in accordance with 10 C.F.R. Part 430, Subpart B, Appendix CC, entitled “Uniform Test Method for Measuring the Energy Consumption of Portable Air Conditioners,” as in effect on January 3, 2017.

Portable electric spas shall meet the requirements of the American National Standard for Portable Electric Spa Energy Efficiency, ANSI/APSP/ICC-14 2014, as that standard exists on July 1, 2018.

Residential ventilating fans shall meet the qualification criteria of the “ENERGY STAR Program Requirements Product Specification for Residential Ventilating Fans,” Version 3.2.

Spray sprinkler bodies shall include an integral pressure regulator and shall meet the water efficiency and performance criteria and other requirements of the Environmental Protection Agency’s “WaterSense Specification for Spray Sprinkler Bodies,” Version 1.0. However, this subdivision (20) shall not apply to spray sprinkler bodies that are specifically excluded from the scope of that specification.

In this subdivision (21), “final rule” means the document setting forth a final action by DOE with respect to a final rule for “Energy Conservation Standards for Uninterruptible Power Supplies,” docket no. EERE-2016-BT-STD-0022, approved by DOE on December 28, 2016. Uninterruptible power supplies that use a National Electrical Manufacturer Association (NEMA) 1-15P or 5-15P input plug and have an alternating current (AC) output shall have an average load-adjusted efficiency that meets or exceed the values shown to be codified under 10 C.F.R. § 430.32(z)(3) and set forth on pages 193-194 of the final rule. Compliance with these requirements shall be measured in accordance with 10 C.F.R. Part 430, Subpart B, Appendix Y, entitled “Uniform Test Method for Measuring the Energy Consumption of Battery Chargers,” as in effect on January 11, 2017.

Water coolers included in the scope of the “ENERGY STAR Program Requirements Product Specification for Water Coolers,” Version 2.0, shall have “on mode with no water draw” energy consumption less than or equal to the following values, measured in accordance with the test requirements of that specification:

0.16 kilowatt-hours (kWh) per day for cold-only units and cook and cold units;

0.87 kWh per day for storage type hot and cold units; and

0.18 kWh per day for on-demand hot and cold units.

When a minimum efficiency standard as described in subsection (a) of this section sets forth requirements that change over time, the rules shall provide for compliance with the changed requirements as they come into effect.

When a subdivision within subdivisions (a)(8) through (a)(22) of this section requires compliance with an efficiency standard or testing protocol contained in a document issued by an agency of the United States, another state, or a nationally or internationally recognized organization, the rules of the Commissioner may incorporate the specified standard or protocol by reference pursuant to

3 V.S.A. § 838

rather than setting forth its language.

With respect to computers and computer monitors subject to subdivision (a)(13) of this section, the Commissioner shall have authority to adopt official interpretations of the applicable efficiency standards published by the staff of the California Energy Commission (CEC). The rules shall state the process for such adoption and the manner in which the Commissioner will make the adopted interpretations publicly available.

Product Type Maximum Maximum AFUE electricity ratio Natural gas- and propane- fired furnaces 90% 2.0% Oil-fired furnaces >= 94,000 Btus/hour in capacity 83% 2.0% Oil-fired furnaces < 94,000 Btus/hour in capacity 83% 2.3% Natural gas-, oil-, and propane-fired hot water residential boilers 84% Not applicable Natural gas-, oil-, and propane-fired steam residential boilers 82% Not applicable

Nameplate output power Minimum efficiency in Active Mode 0 to < 1 watt 0.49* Nameplate Output >= 1 watt and /le 49 watts 0.09*Ln(Nameplate Output power) + 0.49 > 49 watts 0.84 Maximum Energy Consumption in No-Load Mode 0 to < 10 watts 0.5 watts >= 10 watts and /le 250 watts 0.75 watts

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2009, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. June 4, 2010;

2017, No. 42

, § 4, eff. May 22, 2017;

2017, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 2796.
Implementation.

No new medium voltage dry-type distribution transformer, State-regulated incandescent reflector lamp, or single-voltage external AC to DC power supply manufactured on or after January 1, 2008 may be sold or offered for sale in the State unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in the rules adopted pursuant to section 2795 of this title.

On or after January 1, 2009, no new metal halide lamp fixture may be sold or offered for sale in the State unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in the rules adopted pursuant to section 2795 of this title.

No later than six months after the date of enactment of this chapter, the Commissioner, in consultation with the Attorney General, shall determine if implementation of State standards for residential furnaces and residential boilers requires a waiver from federal preemption. If the Commissioner determines that a waiver from federal preemption is not needed, those State standards shall go into effect on June 1, 2008, or if this determination is made after June 1, 2007, those standards shall go into effect one year after the date of this determination. If the Commissioner determines that a waiver from federal preemption is required, the Commissioner shall apply for that waiver within one year of that determination and upon approval of that waiver application, the applicable standards shall go into effect at the earliest date permitted by federal law.

On or after July 1, 2019, no new luminaire that is designed and marketed to operate with T12 fluorescent lamps may be sold or offered for sale in the State. This prohibition shall not apply to a luminaire that the seller purchased on or before June 30, 2019.
(d) (1) On or after July 1, 2019, no new luminaire that is designed and marketed to operate with T12 fluorescent lamps may be sold or offered for sale in the State. This prohibition shall not apply to a luminaire that the seller purchased on or before June 30, 2019.

On or after July 1, 2020, no new air compressor, commercial dishwasher, commercial fryer, commercial hot-food holding cabinet, commercial steam cooker, computer or computer monitor, high CRI fluorescent lamp, portable electric spa, residential ventilating fan, spray sprinkler body, uninterruptible power supply, or water cooler may be sold or offered for sale, lease, or rent in the State unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in the rules adopted pursuant to section 2795 of this title.

On or after July 1, 2021, no new faucet, showerhead, or urinal may be sold or offered for sale, lease, or rent in the State unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in the rules adopted pursuant to section 2795 of this title.

This subdivision governs the date after which no new portable air conditioner may be sold or offered for sale, lease, or rent in the State unless the efficiency of the new product meets or exceeds the efficiency standards set forth in the rules adopted pursuant to section 2795 of this title (the compliance date).

(B)

If, prior to January 1, 2019, the U.S. Department of Energy (DOE) has published a final rule in the Federal Register establishing efficiency standards for portable air conditioners and the rule has not been repealed, voided, or retracted, the compliance date shall be on or after the date as of which portable air conditioners are required to comply with the DOE rule.

The prohibitions set forth in subdivisions (2) through (4) of this subsection shall not apply to a product that the seller or lessor purchased:

in the case of a product listed in subdivision (2) of this subsection, on or before June 30, 2020;

in the case of a faucet, showerhead, or urinal, on or before June 30, 2021; and

in the case of a portable air conditioner, before the first date on which compliance is required under subdivision (4) of this subsection.

(A)

The compliance date shall be on or after February 1, 2022, unless subdivision (B) of this subdivision (4) applies.

Owners and operators of commercial and industrial facilities shall be allowed to utilize appliances and equipment that do not meet the requirements of section 2795 of this title for the repair or replacement of existing equipment, provided that the equipment being repaired or replaced was acquired before the implementation date determined according to the provisions of this section. At the discretion of the owners and operators, these appliances and equipment may be used at any time before or after the effective date of those requirements.

When federal preemption under 42 U.S.C. § 6297 applies to a standard adopted pursuant to this chapter for a product, the standard shall become enforceable on the occurrence of the earliest of the following:
(f) (1) When federal preemption under 42 U.S.C. § 6297 applies to a standard adopted pursuant to this chapter for a product, the standard shall become enforceable on the occurrence of the earliest of the following:

The federal energy or water conservation standard for the product under 42 U.S.C. chapter 77 is withdrawn, repealed, or otherwise voided. However, this subdivision (A) shall not apply to any federal energy or water conservation standard set aside by a court of competent jurisdiction upon the petition of a person who will be adversely affected, as provided in

42 U.S.C. § 6306(b)

.

A waiver of federal preemption is issued pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 6297.

The federal standard for general service lamps shall be considered to be withdrawn, repealed, or otherwise voided within the meaning of this subsection if it does not come into effect on January 20, 2020 pursuant to the actions published at 82 Fed. Reg. 7276 and 7333 (January 19, 2017).

When a standard adopted pursuant to this chapter becomes enforceable under this subsection, a person shall not sell or offer for sale in the State a new product subject to the standard unless the efficiency or water conservation of the new product meets or exceeds the requirements set forth in the standard.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 42

, § 5, eff. May 22, 2017;

2017, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 2797.
Revised standards.

The Commissioner may adopt rules, in accordance with the provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, to revise efficiency standards for the products listed in section 2794 of this title, in order to make the standards conform to standards in effect in other states, where to do so is in the interests of the electrical energy consumers of the State. In considering increased standards, the Commissioner shall set efficiency standards upon a determination that increased efficiency standards would serve to promote energy conservation in the State and would be cost-effective for consumers who purchase and use those products. No increased efficiency standards shall become effective within one year following the adoption of any amended rules establishing those increased efficiency standards. The Commissioner may apply for a waiver of federal preemption in accordance with federal procedures (

42 U.S.C. § 6297(d))

for State efficiency standards for any product regulated by the federal government.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.